Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-805
Notice to be posted in place of business.

All persons, firms, partnerships, limited liability companies, or corporations taking advantage of sections 52-801 to 52-806 must keep posted at all times in a prominent place in their receiving office or offices two notices which shall read as follows: All articles cleaned, pressed, glazed, laundered, washed, altered, or repaired and not called for in ninety days will be sold to pay charges. All articles which are stored by agreement and upon which the charges are not paid for twelve months will be sold to pay charges.

Laws 1943, c. 120, § 5, p. 417;

R.S.1943, § 52-805;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 313.